Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-1204
Tax; proceeds; distribution.

Of the tax imposed by section 9-1203, seventy-five percent shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit as follows: Two and one-half percent to the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund, two and one-half percent to the General Fund, and seventy percent to the Property Tax Credit Cash Fund. The remaining twenty-five percent of the tax shall be remitted to the county treasurer of the county in which the licensed racetrack enclosure is located to be distributed as follows: (1) If the licensed racetrack enclosure is located completely within an unincorporated area of a county, the remaining twenty-five percent shall be distributed to the county in which such licensed racetrack enclosure is located; or (2) if the licensed racetrack enclosure is located at least partially within the limits of a city or village in such county, one-half of the remaining twenty-five percent shall be distributed to such county and one-half of the remaining twenty-five percent to the city or village in which such licensed racetrack enclosure is at least partially located.

Initiative Law 2020, No. 431, § 4.